Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-114
Agricultural, engineering, and scientific courses; attendance.

The Board of Regents shall provide a rule for attendance upon the agricultural college and civil engineering and scientific courses by persons whose employments are such as to allow of their pursuit of study only a portion of the year.

Laws 1869, § 19, p. 177;

R.S.1913, § 7098;

C.S.1922, § 6730;

C.S.1929, § 85-116;

R.S.1943, § 85-114.